Maryland, session 2026, HB0433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
7–102.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Common ownership” means direct or indirect ownership of more than
50% of a person.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0433*

HOUSE BILL 433
(3) “Principal business” means a business activity of a person that
comprises more than 50% of the total business activities of the person.
(4) “PROPERTY MANAGER” MEANS A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR THE
MANAGEMENT AND MAINTENANCE OF REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING:
(I) FINDING TENANTS;
(II) COLLECTING RENT, UTILITIES, AND FEES;
(III) PAYING EXPENSES AND APPLICABLE TAXES;
(IV) MAINTAINING UTILITIES AND SYSTEMS; AND
(V) TAKING ANY NECESSARY ACTIONS TO MANAGE AND
OPERATE REAL PROPERTY.
(b) This title does not apply to:
(1) a bank;
(2) a federal or State credit union;
(3) a mortgage lender;
(4) a person acting under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction;
(5) a licensed real estate broker, or an individual acting on behalf of the
real estate broker, in the collection of rent or allied charges for property;
(6) a savings and loan association;
(7) a title company as to its escrow business;
(8) a trust company;
(9) a lawyer who is collecting a debt for a client, unless the lawyer has an
employee who:
(i) is not a lawyer; and
(ii) is engaged primarily to solicit debts for collection or primarily
makes contact with a debtor to collect or adjust a debt through a procedure identified with
the operation of a collection agency; [or]

HOUSE BILL 433 3
(10) a person who is collecting a debt for another person if:
(i) both persons are related by common ownership;
(ii) the person who is collecting a debt does so only for those persons
to whom it is related by common ownership;
(iii) the principal business of the person who is collecting a debt is not
the collection of debts; and
(iv) before collecting a debt, the person files with the Board:
1. the correct name of the person;
2. an address and telephone number of a contact person; and
3. the name of the person’s resident agent; OR
(11) A PROPERTY MANAGER COLLECTING PAYMENT FOR RENT,
UTILITIES, OR FEES FROM A RESIDENTIAL TENANT ON BEHALF OF A PROPERTY
OWNER IF:
(I) PAYMENT IS COLLECTED ONLY DURING THE TERM OF THE
LEASE OR A HOLDOVER PERIOD; AND
(II) THE COLLECTION OF DEBTS, INCLUDING FOR RENT,
UTILITIES, AND FEES IS NOT THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF THE PROPERTY MANAGER
WITH RESPECT TO THE PROPERTY.
7–301.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person must have a license
whenever the person does business as a collection agency in the State.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.